Arkansas, session 2025, SB297.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 14-43-307, concerning the election of
council members at large or by ward, is amended to add an additional
subsection to read as follows:
(c)(1) Ordinances enacted under subdivision (b)(1) of this section
shall be filed with the county clerk no later than August 31 of the calendar
year before the election of council members.
(2) A city of the first class that has an ordinance enacted
under subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall file the ordinance with the
county clerk no later than January 1, 2026.
(3) Once an ordinance is filed with the county clerk, changes
*SSS172*
02/25/2025 9:10:44 AM SSS172

SB297
shall not be made to the election of council members until a new ordinance is
passed by the governing body of the municipality and filed with the county
clerk by August 31 of the calendar year before the election of council
members.
(4) A city of the first class that does not file an ordinance
under subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall have its council members
elected at large.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 14-43-308, concerning the residence
qualifications of council members in primaries, is amended to add an
additional subsection read as follows:
(c)(1) Ordinances enacted under subdivision (b)(1) of this section
shall be filed with the county clerk no later than August 31 of the calendar
year before the election of council members.
(2) A city of the first class that has an ordinance enacted
under subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall file the ordinance with the
county clerk no later than January 1, 2026.
(3) Once an ordinance is filed with the county clerk, changes
shall not be made to the election of council members until a new ordinance is
passed by the governing body of the municipality and filed with the county
clerk by August 31 of the calendar year before the election of council
members.
(4) A city of the first class that does not file an ordinance
under subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall have its council members
elected at large.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 14-43-309, concerning the residence
qualifications of council members in general elections, is amended to add an
additional subsection to read as follows:
(c)(1) Ordinances enacted under subdivision (b)(1) of this section
shall be filed with the county clerk no later than August 31 of the calendar
year before the election of council members.
(2) A city of the first class that has an ordinance enacted
under subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall file the ordinance with the
county clerk no later than January 1, 2026.
(3) Once an ordinance is filed with the county clerk, changes
02/25/2025 9:10:44 AM SSS172

SB297
shall not be made to the election of council members until a new ordinance is
passed by the governing body of the municipality and filed with the county
clerk by August 31 of the calendar year before the election of council
members.
(4) A city of the first class that does not file an ordinance
under subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall have its council members
elected at large.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 14-44-103(b)(1)(C)(i), concerning the
election of council members in a city of the second class, is amended to read
as follows:
(C)(i) Except as provided in subdivision (b)(1)(C)(ii) of
this section, the county board of election commissioners in the city shall
ensure that the qualified electors of each ward have at least one (1) voting
precinct in each ward where the resident electors of the ward may cast their
ballots.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 14-44-103, concerning the election of
council members in a city of the second class, is amended to add an
additional subsection to read as follows:
(e)(1) Ordinances enacted under subdivision (c)(1) of this section
shall be filed with the county clerk no later than August 31 of the calendar
year before the election of council members.
(2) A city of the second class that has an ordinance enacted
under subdivision (c)(1) of this section shall file the ordinance with the
county clerk no later than January 1, 2026.
(3) Once an ordinance is filed with the county clerk, changes
shall not be made to the election of council members until a new ordinance is
passed by the governing body of the municipality and filed with the county
clerk by August 31 of the calendar year before the election of council
members.
(4) A city of the second class that does not file an ordinance
under subdivision (c)(1) of this section shall have its council members
elected at large.


02/25/2025 9:10:44 AM SSS172